dictsource/th_rules
.group          ะ
	L01)ะ    aʔ
	_) ะ    a
	แ)ะ    ɛ	//แ◌ะ
	โ)ะ    o
	า)ะ    oo
.group		็
	แ)็ว	ɛw	// แ◌็ว
	แ)็(L01	ɛ	// แ◌็◌
	L01)็อย(_	ɔj	//◌็อย
	L01)็อ(L01	ɔ
.group		ั
	L01)ัว	ua	//◌ัว
	L01)ัย	ai
	L01)ั(L01	a
.group		เ
	L01)เ(_	eː	//เ◌
	L01)เว	ew	// เ◌ว
	L01)เ็ว(_	ew	// เ◌็ว
	L01)เ็(L01	e	//เ◌็◌
	L01)เะ(_   e	//เ◌ะ
	L01)เอ(_ 	ɤː	//เ◌อ
	L01)เอะ(_ 	ɤ	//เ◌อะ
	เก	ke:
	เกณฑ์	ke:n
	เกด	ke:t˨˩
	เกตุ	ke:t˨˩
	เกม	ke:m
	เกมส์	ke:m
	เกย	kɤ:j
	เกย์	ke:
	เกรง	kre:ŋ
	เกรด	kre:t˨˩
	เกราะ	krɔʔ˨˩
	เกริก	krɤ:k˨˩
	เกริ่น	krɤ:n˨˩
	เกรียง	kriaŋ
	เกรียน	krian
	เกรียม	kriam
	เกรี้ยว	kriaw˥˩
	เกร็ง	kreŋ
	เกร็ด	kret˨˩
	เกลอ	klɤ:
	เกลา	klaw
	เกลียด	kliat˨˩
	เกลียว	kliaw
	เกลี่ย	klia˨˩
	เกลี้ยง	kliaŋ˥˩
	เกลือ	klɯa
	เกลือก	klɯak˨˩
	เกล็ด	klet˨˩
	เกล้า	kla:w˥˩
	เกวียน	kwian
	เกา	kaw
	เกาต์	kaw˦˥
	เกาะ	kɔʔ˨˩
	เกิด	kɤ:t˨˩
	เกิน	kɤ:n
	เกียรติ	kiat˨˩
	เกี่ยง	kiaŋ˨˩
	เกี่ยว	kiaw˨˩
	เกี้ยว	kiaw˥˩
	เกี๊ยว	kiaw˦˥
	เกี๊ยะ	kiaʔ˦˥
	เกือก	kɯak˨˩
	เกือบ	kɯap˨˩
	เกื้อ	kɯa˥˩
	เก็ง	keŋ
	เก็บ	kep˨˩
	เก่ง	keŋ˨˩
	เก่า	kaw˨˩
	เก้ง	keŋ˥˩
	เก้า	ka:w˥˩
	เก๊ก	kek˦˥
	เก๊ะ	keʔ˦˥
	เก๋ง	ke:ŋ˩˦
	เก๋า	kaw˩˦
	เขก	khe:k˨˩
	เขต	khe:t˨˩
	เขน	khe:n˩˦
	เขย	khɤ:j˩˦
	เขลา	khlaw˩˦
	เขวี้ยง	khwiaŋ˥˩
	เขา	khaw˩˦
	เขิน	khɤ:n˩˦
	เขียง	khiaŋ˩˦
	เขียน	khian˩˦
	เขียว	khiaw˩˦
	เขี่ย	khia˨˩
	เขี้ยว	khiaw˥˩
	เขือ	khɯa˩˦
	เขื่อง	khɯaŋ˨˩
	เขื่อน	khɯan˨˩
	เข็ญ	khen˩˦
	เข็ด	khet˨˩
	เข็น	khen˩˦
	เข็ม	khem˩˦
	เข่ง	kheŋ˨˩
	เข่า	khaw˨˩
	เข้	khe:˥˩
	เข้ม	khem˥˩
	เข้า	khaw˥˩
	เฃียน	khian˩˦
	เฃ้า	khaw˥˩
	เค	khe:
	เคย	khɤ:j
	เครน	khre:n
	เครา	khraw
	เคราะห์	khrɔʔ˦˥
	เครียด	khriat˥˩
	เครือ	khrɯa
	เครื่อง	khrɯaŋ˥˩
	เคร่ง	khreŋ˥˩
	เคลม	khle:m
	เคลิ้ม	khlɤ:m˦˥
	เคลียร์	khlia
	เคลือบ	khlɯap˥˩
	เคลื่อน	khlɯan˥˩
	เคล็ด	khlet˦˥
	เคล้า	khlaw˦˥
	เคว้ง	khwe:ŋ˦˥
	เคส	khe:t˦˥
	เคานต์	khaw˦˥
	เคาะ	khɔʔ˦˥
	เคียง	khiaŋ
	เคียฟ	khiaf˦˥
	เคียว	khiaw
	เคี่ยว	khiaw˥˩
	เคี้ยว	khiaw˦˥
	เคือง	khɯaŋ
	เค็ม	khem
	เค้ก	khe:k˦˥
	เค้ง	khe:ŋ˦˥
	เค้น	khen˦˥
	เค้า	khaw˦˥
	เฆี่ยน	khian˥˩
	เงย	ŋɤ:j
	เงา	ŋaw
	เงาะ	ŋɔʔ˦˥
	เงิน	ŋɤn
	เงียบ	ŋiap˥˩
	เงี่ยง	ŋiaŋ˥˩
	เงี่ยน	ŋian˥˩
	เงี้ยว	ŋiaw˦˥
	เงือก	ŋɯak˥˩
	เงื่อน	ŋɯan˥˩
	เง่า	ŋaw˥˩
	เจ	che:
	เจอ	chɤ:
	เจาะ	chɔʔ˨˩
	เจิม	chɤ:m
	เจียน	chian
	เจียม	chiam
	เจียว	chiaw
	เจี๊ยว	chiaw˦˥
	เจี๊ยะ	chiaʔ˦˥
	เจือ	chɯa
	เจื๋อน	chɯan˩˦
	เจ็ด	chet˨˩
	เจ็บ	chep˨˩
	เจ้า	cha:w˥˩
	เจ๊	che:˦˥
	เจ๊ก	chek˦˥
	เจ๊ง	cheŋ˦˥
	เจ๋ง	cheŋ˩˦
	เฉ	che:˩˦
	เฉก	che:k˨˩
	เฉด	che:t˨˩
	เฉย	chɤ:j˩˦
	เฉา	chaw˩˦
	เฉาะ	chɔʔ˨˩
	เฉียง	chiaŋ˩˦
	เฉียด	chiat˨˩
	เฉียบ	chiap˨˩
	เฉือน	chɯan˩˦
	เฉื่อย	chɯaj˨˩
	เฉ่ง	che:ŋ˨˩
	เชน	che:n
	เชฟ	che:p˥˩
	เชย	chɤ:j
	เชอง	chɤ:ŋ
	เชาวน์	chaw
	เชิง	chɤ:ŋ
	เชิญ	chɤ:n
	เชิด	chɤ:t˥˩
	เชียง	chiaŋ
	เชียร์	chia
	เชี่ย	chia˥˩
	เชี่ยว	chiaw˥˩
	เชือก	chɯak˥˩
	เชือด	chɯat˥˩
	เชื่อ	chɯa˥˩
	เชื่อง	chɯaŋ˥˩
	เชื่อม	chɯam˥˩
	เชื้อ	chɯa˦˥
	เช็ก	chek˦˥
	เช็ค	chek˦˥
	เช็ด	chet˦˥
	เช่น	chen˥˩
	เช่า	chaw˥˩
	เช้ง	cheŋ˦˥
	เช้า	cha:w˦˥
	เซ	se:
	เซน	se:n
	เซฟ	sef˦˥
	เซลล์	se:l
	เซอร์	sɤ:˥˩
	เซา	saw
	เซาะ	sɔʔ˦˥
	เซียน	sian
	เซ็กส์	sek˦˥
	เซ็ง	seŋ
	เซ่น	sen˥˩
	เซ่อ	sɤ:˥˩
	เฌอ	chɤ:
	เฒ่า	thaw˥˩
	เณร	ne:n
	เดท	de:t˨˩
	เดน	de:n
	เดา	daw
	เดาะ	dɔʔ˨˩
	เดิน	dɤ:n
	เดิม	dɤ:m
	เดิ้ง	dɤ:ŋ˥˩
	เดียว	diaw
	เดี่ยว	diaw˨˩
	เดี๋ยว	diaw˩˦
	เดือด	dɯat˨˩
	เดือน	dɯan
	เดือย	dɯaj
	เด็ก	dek˨˩
	เด็ด	det˨˩
	เด่	de:˨˩
	เด่น	den˨˩
	เด้ง	deŋ˥˩
	เตง	te:ŋ
	เตย	tɤ:j
	เตรียม	triam
	เตร่	treʔ˨˩
	เตะ	teʔ˨˩
	เตา	taw
	เติม	tɤ:m
	เตียง	tiaŋ
	เตียน	tian
	เตี่ย	tia˨˩
	เตี้ย	tia˥˩
	เตี๊ยม	tiam˦˥
	เตือน	tɯan
	เต็นท์	ten˦˥
	เต็ม	tem
	เต่ง	te:ŋ˨˩
	เต่า	taw˨˩
	เต้น	ten˥˩
	เต้า	taw˥˩
	เต๋า	taw˩˦
	เถร	the:n˩˦
	เถอะ	thɤʔ˨˩
	เถา	thaw˩˦
	เถาะ	thɔʔ˨˩
	เถิด	thɤ:t˨˩
	เถียง	thiaŋ˩˦
	เถือ	thɯa˩˦
	เถื่อน	thɯan˨˩
	เถ้า	thaw˥˩
	เท	the:
	เทป	the:p˦˥
	เทพ	the:p˥˩
	เทพย์	the:p˥˩
	เทริด	sɤ:t˥˩
	เทศ	the:t˥˩
	เทศน์	the:t˥˩
	เทห์	the:
	เทา	thaw
	เทิง	thɤ:ŋ
	เทิน	thɤ:n
	เทียด	thiat˥˩
	เทียน	thian
	เทียบ	thiap˥˩
	เทียม	thiam
	เที่ยง	thiaŋ˥˩
	เที่ยว	thiaw˥˩
	เทือก	thɯak˥˩
	เท่	the:˥˩
	เท่ห์	the:˥˩
	เท่า	thaw˥˩
	เท้า	tha:w˦˥
	เธอ	thɤ:
	เนตร	ne:t˥˩
	เนย	nɤ:j
	เนา	naw
	เนิน	nɤ:n
	เนิ่น	nɤ:n˥˩
	เนียง	niaŋ
	เนียน	nian
	เนี่ย	nia˥˩
	เนื่อง	nɯaŋ˥˩
	เนื้อ	nɯa˦˥
	เน็ต	net˨˩
	เน่า	naw˥˩
	เน้น	nen˦˥
	เบน	be:n
	เบรก	bre:k˨˩
	เบอร์	bɤ:
	เบา	baw
	เบาะ	bɔʔ˨˩
	เบิก	bɤ:k˨˩
	เบิร์น	bɤ:n
	เบิ้ล	bɤn˥˩
	เบียด	biat˨˩
	เบียน	bian
	เบียร์	bia
	เบี่ยง	biaŋ˨˩
	เบี้ย	bia˥˩
	เบี้ยว	biaw˥˩
	เบือน	bɯan
	เบื่อ	bɯa˨˩
	เบื้อง	bɯaŋ˥˩
	เบื๊อก	bɯak˦˥
	เบ็ด	bet˨˩
	เบ่ง	beŋ˨˩
	เบ้า	baw˥˩
	เบ๊	be:˦˥
	เปน	pen
	เปรต	pre:t˨˩
	เปรอ	prɤ:
	เปรอะ	prɤʔ˨˩
	เปราะ	prɔʔ˨˩
	เปรียบ	priap˨˩
	เปรี้ยว	priaw˥˩
	เปล	ple:
	เปลว	ple:w
	เปลี่ยน	plian˨˩
	เปลี่ยว	pliaw˨˩
	เปลือก	plɯak˨˩
	เปลือง	plɯaŋ
	เปลือย	plɯaj
	เปลื้อง	plɯaŋ˥˩
	เปล่ง	pleŋ˨˩
	เปล่า	pla:w˨˩
	เปา	paw
	เปิด	pɤ:t˨˩
	เปิบ	pɤ:p˨˩
	เปิ่น	pɤn˨˩
	เปีย	pia
	เปียก	piak˨˩
	เปี่ยม	piam˨˩
	เปื่อย	pɯaj˨˩
	เปื้อน	pɯan˥˩
	เป็ด	pet˨˩
	เป็น	pen
	เป่า	paw˨˩
	เป้	pe:˥˩
	เป้า	paw˥˩
	เป๊ะ	peʔ˦˥
	เผย	phɤ:j˩˦
	เผลอ	phlɤ:˩˦
	เผา	phaw˩˦
	เผือ	phɯa˩˦
	เผือก	phɯak˨˩
	เผื่อ	phɯa˨˩
	เผ็ด	phet˨˩
	เผ่น	phen˨˩
	เผ่า	phaw˨˩
	เฝอ	fɤ:˩˦
	เฝือก	fɯak˨˩
	เฝ้า	faw˥˩
	เพจ	phe:t˨˩
	เพชร	phet˦˥
	เพรง	phre:ŋ
	เพราะ	phrɔʔ˦˥
	เพรียง	phriaŋ
	เพล	phe:n
	เพลง	phle:ŋ
	เพลา	phlaw
	เพลิง	phlɤ:ŋ
	เพลิด	phlɤ:t˥˩
	เพลิน	phlɤ:n
	เพลีย	phlia
	เพลี้ย	phlia˦˥
	เพศ	phe:t˥˩
	เพาะ	phɔʔ˦˥
	เพิก	phɤ:k˥˩
	เพิง	phɤ:ŋ
	เพิ่ง	phɤŋ˥˩
	เพิ่ม	phɤ:m˥˩
	เพียง	phiaŋ
	เพียบ	phiap˥˩
	เพียร	phian
	เพี้ยง	phiaŋ˦˥
	เพี้ยน	phian˦˥
	เพื่อ	phɯa˥˩
	เพื่อน	phɯan˥˩
	เพ่ง	pheŋ˥˩
	เพ้อ	phɤ:˦˥
	เฟส	fe:t˥˩
	เฟอร์	fɤ:
	เฟิร์น	fɤ:n
	เฟือง	fɯaŋ
	เฟือย	fɯaj
	เฟื่อง	fɯaŋ˥˩
	เฟื้อง	fɯaŋ˦˥
	เฟ้น	fen˦˥
	เฟ้อ	fɤ:˦˥
	เภท	phe:t˥˩
	เมฆ	me:k˥˩
	เมตร	me:t˦˥
	เมธ	me:t˥˩
	เมน	me:n
	เมนส์	men
	เมรุ	me:n
	เมล์	me:
	เมษ	me:t˥˩
	เมา	maw
	เมาส์	maw˦˥
	เมาะ	mɔʔ˦˥
	เมิน	mɤ:n
	เมีย	mia
	เมี่ยง	miaŋ˥˩
	เมือ	mɯa
	เมือก	mɯak˥˩
	เมือง	mɯaŋ
	เมื่อ	mɯa˥˩
	เมื่อย	mɯaj˥˩
	เม็ด	met˦˥
	เม่น	men˥˩
	เม้าส์	maw˦˥
	เย	je:
	เยน	je:n
	เยอะ	jɤʔ˦˥
	เยิ้ม	jɤ:m˦˥
	เยีย	jia
	เยี่ยง	jiaŋ˥˩
	เยี่ยม	jiam˥˩
	เยี่ยว	jiaw˥˩
	เยือก	jɯak˥˩
	เยือน	jɯan
	เยื่อ	jɯa˥˩
	เย็ด	jet˦˥
	เย็น	jen
	เย็บ	jep˦˥
	เร	re:
	เรอ	rɤ:
	เรา	raw
	เริม	rɤ:m
	เริ่ด	rɤ:t˥˩
	เริ่ม	rɤ:m˥˩
	เรียก	riak˥˩
	เรียง	riaŋ
	เรียน	rian
	เรียบ	riap˥˩
	เรียม	riam
	เรียว	riaw
	เรือ	rɯa
	เรือง	rɯaŋ
	เรือด	rɯat˥˩
	เรือน	rɯan
	เรื่อง	rɯaŋ˥˩
	เรื่อย	rɯaj˥˩
	เรื้อน	rɯan˦˥
	เร็ว	rew
	เร่	re:˥˩
	เร่ง	reŋ˥˩
	เร้า	raw˦˥
	เลข	le:k˥˩
	เลน	le:n
	เลนส์	len
	เลย	lɤ:j
	เลว	le:w
	เลอ	lɤ:
	เลอะ	lɤʔ˦˥
	เละ	leʔ˦˥
	เลา	law
	เลาะ	lɔʔ˦˥
	เลิก	lɤ:k˥˩
	เลีย	lia
	เลียน	lian
	เลียบ	liap˥˩
	เลี่ยง	liaŋ˥˩
	เลี่ยน	lian˥˩
	เลี่ยม	liam˥˩
	เลี้ยง	liaŋ˦˥
	เลี้ยว	liaw˦˥
	เลือก	lɯak˥˩
	เลือด	lɯat˥˩
	เลือน	lɯan
	เลื่อน	lɯan˥˩
	เลื่อม	lɯam˥˩
	เลื่อย	lɯaj˥˩
	เลื้อย	lɯaj˦˥
	เล็ก	lek˦˥
	เล็ง	leŋ
	เล็ด	let˦˥
	เล็น	len
	เล็บ	lep˦˥
	เล็ม	lem
	เล่น	len˥˩
	เล่ม	lem˥˩
	เล่า	law˥˩
	เล้า	law˦˥
	เวช	we:t˥˩
	เวท	we:t˥˩
	เวทย์	we:t˥˩
	เวน	we:n
	เวร	we:n
	เวลส์	we:l
	เวิ้ง	wɤ:ŋ˦˥
	เวียง	wiaŋ
	เวียน	wian
	เวี่ย	wia˥˩
	เว่อร์	wɤ:˥˩
	เว้	we:˦˥
	เว้น	wen˦˥
	เว้า	waw˦˥
	เศร้า	saw˥˩
	เศษ	se:t˨˩
	เศิก	sɤk˨˩
	เสก	se:k˨˩
	เสพ	se:p˨˩
	เสพย์	se:p˨˩
	เสย	sɤ:j˩˦
	เสริม	sɤ:m˩˦
	เสร็จ	set˨˩
	เสา	saw˩˦
	เสาร์	saw˩˦
	เสาะ	sɔʔ˨˩
	เสิก	sɤk˨˩
	เสิร์ฟ	sɤ:p˨˩
	เสีย	sia˩˦
	เสียง	siaŋ˩˦
	เสียด	siat˨˩
	เสียบ	siap˨˩
	เสียม	siam˩˦
	เสียว	siaw˩˦
	เสี่ยง	siaŋ˨˩
	เสี่ยว	siaw˨˩
	เสี้ยน	sian˥˩
	เสี้ยม	siam˥˩
	เสี้ยว	siaw˥˩
	เสือ	sɯa˩˦
	เสือก	sɯak˨˩
	เสื่อ	sɯa˨˩
	เสื่อม	sɯam˨˩
	เสื้อ	sɯa˥˩
	เส้น	sen˥˩
	เห	he:˩˦
	เหงา	ŋaw˩˦
	เหงือก	ŋɯak˨˩
	เหงื่อ	ŋɯa˨˩
	เหง้า	ŋaw˥˩
	เหตุ	he:t˨˩
	เหนียง	niaŋ˩˦
	เหนียว	niaw˩˦
	เหนี่ยว	niaw˨˩
	เหนือ	nɯa˩˦
	เหนื่อย	nɯaj˨˩
	เหน็บ	nep˨˩
	เหน่อ	nɤ:˨˩
	เหมาะ	mɔʔ˨˩
	เหมียว	miaw˩˦
	เหมือง	mɯaŋ˩˦
	เหมือน	mɯan˩˦
	เหม็น	men˩˦
	เหม่อ	mɤ:˨˩
	เหยาะ	jɔʔ˨˩
	เหยียด	jiat˨˩
	เหยียบ	jiap˨˩
	เหยี่ยว	jiaw˨˩
	เหยือก	jɯak˨˩
	เหยื่อ	jɯa˨˩
	เหย้า	jaw˥˩
	เหรอ	rɤ:˩˦
	เหรียญ	rian˩˦
	เหร่	re:˨˩
	เหลน	le:n˩˦
	เหลว	le:w˩˦
	เหลา	law˩˦
	เหลิง	lɤ:ŋ˩˦
	เหลียว	liaw˩˦
	เหลี่ยม	liam˨˩
	เหลือ	lɯa˩˦
	เหลือง	lɯaŋ˩˦
	เหลือบ	lɯap˨˩
	เหลือม	lɯam˩˦
	เหลื่อม	lɯam˨˩
	เหล็ก	lek˨˩
	เหล่า	law˨˩
	เหล้า	law˥˩
	เหว	he:w˩˦
	เหวอะ	wɤʔ˨˩
	เหวี่ยง	wiaŋ˨˩
	เหา	haw˩˦
	เหาะ	hɔʔ˨˩
	เหิน	hɤ:n˩˦
	เหี่ยว	hiaw˨˩
	เหี้ย	hia˥˩
	เหือด	hɯat˨˩
	เห็ด	het˨˩
	เห็น	hen˩˦
	เห็บ	hep˨˩
	เห่า	haw˨˩
	เอ	ʔe:
	เอก	ʔe:k˨˩
	เอกซ์	ʔek˦˥
	เอง	ʔe:ŋ
	เอช	ʔe:ch˦˥
	เอดส์	ʔe:t˨˩
	เอน	ʔe:n
	เอป	ʔe:p˦˥
	เอฟ	ʔe:f˨˩
	เอย	ʔɤ:j
	เอลฟ์	ʔel˦˥
	เอว	ʔe:w
	เอส	ʔe:s˦˥
	เอา	ʔaw
	เอียง	ʔiaŋ
	เอียน	ʔian
	เอี่ยม	ʔiam˨˩
	เอี๊ยม	ʔiam˦˥
	เอือม	ʔɯam
	เอื่อย	ʔɯaj˨˩
	เอื้อ	ʔɯa˥˩
	เอื้อง	ʔɯaŋ˥˩
	เอื้อม	ʔɯam˥˩
	เอ็กซ์	ʔek˦˥
	เอ็ง	ʔeŋ
	เอ็ด	ʔet˨˩
	เอ็น	ʔen
	เอ็ม	ʔem
	เอ่ย	ʔɤ:j˨˩
	เอ๋อ	ʔɤ:˩˦
	เฮ	he:
	เฮก	hek˦˥
	เฮง	heŋ
	เฮช	he:ch˦˥
	เฮีย	hia
	เฮี้ยน	hian˦˥
.group		แ
	_) แ(L01	ɛː	//แ◌
	_) แ(L01L01	ɛː	//แ◌◌
	แก	kɛ:
	แกง	kɛ:ŋ
	แกน	kɛ:n
	แกม	kɛ:m
	แกรด	krɛ:t˦˥
	แกร่ง	krɛŋ˨˩
	แกลบ	klɛ:p˨˩
	แกล้ง	klɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แกล้ม	klɛ:m˥˩
	แกว	kɛ:w
	แกว่ง	kwɛŋ˨˩
	แกะ	kɛʔ˨˩
	แก็ง	kɛŋ
	แก่	kɛ:˨˩
	แก่ง	kɛŋ˨˩
	แก่น	kɛn˨˩
	แก้	kɛ:˥˩
	แก้ม	kɛ:m˥˩
	แก้ว	kɛ:w˥˩
	แก๊ง	kɛŋ˦˥
	แก๊งค์	kɛ:ŋ˦˥
	แก๊ส	kɛ:t˦˥
	แข	khɛ:˩˦
	แขก	khɛ:k˨˩
	แขน	khɛ:n˩˦
	แขวง	khwɛ:ŋ˩˦
	แขวน	khwɛ:n˩˦
	แขวะ	khwɛʔ˨˩
	แข็ง	khɛŋ˩˦
	แข่ง	khɛŋ˨˩
	แข้ง	khɛŋ˥˩
	แฃวน	khwɛ:n˩˦
	แค	khɛ:
	แคน	khɛ:n
	แคบ	khɛ:p˥˩
	แคม	khɛ:m
	แคมป์	khɛm˦˥
	แคระ	khrɛʔ˦˥
	แคร่	khrɛ:˥˩
	แคล	khɛ:l
	แคว	khwɛ:
	แคว้น	khwɛ:n˦˥
	แคะ	khɛʔ˦˥
	แค่	khɛ:˥˩
	แค้น	khɛ:n˦˥
	แฅว	khwɛ:
	แงะ	ŋɛʔ˦˥
	แง่	ŋɛ:˥˩
	แง้ม	ŋɛ:m˦˥
	แจก	chɛ:k˨˩
	แจง	chɛ:ŋ
	แจว	chɛ:w
	แจ่ม	chɛm˨˩
	แจ้ง	chɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แจ๋ว	chɛw˩˦
	แฉ	chɛ:˩˦
	แฉก	chɛ:k˨˩
	แฉะ	chɛʔ˨˩
	แชร์	chɛ:
	แช่	chɛ:˥˩
	แช่ง	chɛŋ˥˩
	แซ	sɛ:
	แซง	sɛ:ŋ
	แซด	sɛt˦˥
	แซบ	sɛp˥˩
	แซม	sɛ:m
	แซว	sɛw
	แซะ	sɛʔ˦˥
	แซ็ว	sɛw
	แซ่	sɛ:˥˩
	แซ่บ	sɛp˥˩
	แซ้บ	sɛ:p˦˥
	แดก	dɛ:k˨˩
	แดง	dɛ:ŋ
	แดด	dɛ:t˨˩
	แดน	dɛ:n
	แด่	dɛ:˨˩
	แตก	tɛ:k˨˩
	แตง	tɛ:ŋ
	แตด	tɛ:t˨˩
	แตน	tɛ:n
	แตร	trɛ:
	แตะ	tɛʔ˨˩
	แต่	tɛ:˨˩
	แต่ง	tɛŋ˨˩
	แต้ม	tɛ:m˥˩
	แต๋ว	tɛw˩˦
	แถ	thɛ:˩˦
	แถน	thɛ:n˩˦
	แถบ	thɛ:p˨˩
	แถม	thɛ:m˩˦
	แถว	thɛw˩˦
	แทง	thɛ:ŋ
	แทตย์	thɛ:t˥˩
	แทน	thɛ:n
	แทบ	thɛ:p˥˩
	แทรก	sɛ:k˥˩
	แทะ	thɛʔ˦˥
	แท็ก	thɛk˨˩
	แท่ง	thɛŋ˥˩
	แท่น	thɛn˥˩
	แท้	thɛ:˦˥
	แท้ง	thɛŋ˦˥
	แนบ	nɛ:p˥˩
	แนว	nɛ:w
	แนะ	nɛʔ˦˥
	แน่	nɛ:˥˩
	แน่น	nɛn˥˩
	แน่ว	nɛw˥˩
	แบ	bɛ:
	แบก	bɛ:k˨˩
	แบงก์	bɛŋ˦˥
	แบงค์	bɛŋ˦˥
	แบต	bɛt˨˩
	แบน	bɛ:n
	แบบ	bɛ:p˨˩
	แบร์น	bɛ:n
	แบ่ง	bɛŋ˨˩
	แบ้ว	bɛw˥˩
	แบ๊ว	bɛw˦˥
	แป	pɛ:
	แปด	pɛ:t˨˩
	แปร	prɛ:
	แปรง	prɛ:ŋ
	แปล	plɛ:
	แปลก	plɛ:k˨˩
	แปลง	plɛ:ŋ
	แปลน	plɛ:n
	แปะ	pɛʔ˨˩
	แป้ก	pɛk˥˩
	แป้ง	pɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แป้น	pɛn˥˩
	แป๊ก	pɛk˦˥
	แผง	phɛ:ŋ˩˦
	แผด	phɛ:t˨˩
	แผน	phɛ:n˩˦
	แผล	phlɛ:˩˦
	แผลง	phlɛ:ŋ˩˦
	แผ่	phɛ:˨˩
	แผ่น	phɛn˨˩
	แผ่ว	phɛw˨˩
	แผ้ว	phɛw˥˩
	แฝง	fɛ:ŋ˩˦
	แฝด	fɛ:t˨˩
	แพ	phɛ:
	แพง	phɛ:ŋ
	แพทย์	phɛ:t˥˩
	แพร	phrɛ:
	แพรว	phrɛ:w
	แพร่	phrɛ:˥˩
	แพร่ง	phrɛŋ˥˩
	แพร์	phɛ:
	แพะ	phɛʔ˦˥
	แพ่ง	phɛŋ˥˩
	แพ้	phɛ:˦˥
	แฟกซ์	fɛk˨˩
	แฟน	fɛ:n
	แฟบ	fɛ:p˥˩
	แฟ็กซ์	fɛk˨˩
	แฟ้บ	fɛp˦˥
	แฟ้ม	fɛ:m˦˥
	แฟ๊บ	fɛp˦˥
	แมง	mɛ:ŋ
	แมน	mɛ:n
	แมว	mɛ:w
	แม่	mɛ:˥˩
	แม่ง	mɛŋ˥˩
	แม่น	mɛn˥˩
	แม้	mɛ:˦˥
	แม้ว	mɛw˦˥
	แยก	jɛ:k˥˩
	แยม	jɛ:m
	แย่	jɛ:˥˩
	แย่ง	jɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แย้	jɛ:˦˥
	แย้ง	jɛ:ŋ˦˥
	แย้ม	jɛ:m˦˥
	แร	rɛ:
	แรก	rɛ:k˥˩
	แรง	rɛ:ŋ
	แรด	rɛt˥˩
	แรม	rɛ:m
	แร่	rɛ:˥˩
	แร้ง	rɛ:ŋ˦˥
	แล	lɛ:
	แลก	lɛ:k˥˩
	แลง	lɛ:ŋ
	แลน	lɛ:n
	และ	lɛʔ˦˥
	แล็บ	lɛp˨˩
	แล่	lɛ:˥˩
	แล่น	lɛn˥˩
	แล้ง	lɛ:ŋ˦˥
	แล้ว	lɛ:w˦˥
	แวด	wɛ:t˥˩
	แวน	wɛ:n
	แวว	wɛ:w
	แวะ	wɛʔ˦˥
	แว่น	wɛn˥˩
	แว่ว	wɛw˥˩
	แว้ง	wɛ:ŋ˦˥
	แสก	sɛ:k˨˩
	แสง	sɛ:ŋ˩˦
	แสด	sɛ:t˨˩
	แสน	sɛ:n˩˦
	แสบ	sɛ:p˨˩
	แสร้ง	sɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แสะ	sɛʔ˨˩
	แส้	sɛ:˥˩
	แห	hɛ:˩˦
	แหก	hɛ:k˨˩
	แหงน	ŋɛ:n˩˦
	แหน	hɛ:n˩˦
	แหนบ	nɛ:p˨˩
	แหนม	nɛ:m˩˦
	แหบ	hɛ:p˨˩
	แหม่ม	mɛm˨˩
	แหย่	jɛ:˨˩
	แหลก	lɛ:k˨˩
	แหลม	lɛ:m˩˦
	แหล่	lɛ:˨˩
	แหล่ง	lɛŋ˨˩
	แหวก	wɛ:k˨˩
	แหวน	wɛ:n˩˦
	แหวะ	wɛʔ˨˩
	แหะ	hɛʔ˨˩
	แห่	hɛ:˨˩
	แห่ง	hɛŋ˨˩
	แห้ง	hɛ:ŋ˥˩
	แอ	ʔɛ:
	แอก	ʔɛ:k˨˩
	แอบ	ʔɛ:p˨˩
	แอร์	ʔɛ:
	แอล	ʔɛ:l
	แอ่ง	ʔɛŋ˨˩
	แอ่น	ʔɛn˨˩
	แฮม	hɛm

.group		ิ
	L01)ิ	i	//◌ิ
	L01)ิว	io	//◌ิว
	L01)ิ(L01	i	//◌ิ◌
	เ)ิ(L01	ɤː	//เ◌ิ◌
.group		โ
	โ(L01	oː	//โ◌
	โ(L01L01	oː
.group		ุ
	L01)ุ	u	//◌ุ
	L01)ุย	uj	//◌ุย
	L01)ุ(L01	u

.group		ึ
	L01)ึ(L01	ɯ

.group		า
	L01)า	a:	//◌า
	L01)าย	a:j	//◌าย
	L01)าว	a:w	//◌าว
	เ)า	aw
	เ)าะ	ɔ

.group		ี
	L01)ี	iː
	เ)ีย	ia	//เ◌ีย
	เ)ีย(L01	ia	//เ◌ีย◌
	L01)ี(L01	iː

.group		ู
	L01)ู	uː
	L01)ู(L01	uː
